apertium-tyv.tyv.twol
Alphabet

   А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
   а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я

   %{I%}:ы ! %{I%}:и %{I%}:у %{I%}:ү

   %{A%}:а ! %{A%}:е

   %{E%}:а ! %{A%}:е

   %{D%}:д 
 
   %{L%}:л 

   %{N%}:н 
 
   %{G%}:г ! %{G%}:к

   %{Z%}:з ! %{Z%}:с

   %{g%}:г
 
   %{J%}:ж ! %{J%}:ч

   %{B%}:б ! %{B%}:п %{B%}:м %{B%}:в

   %{i%}:0 ! %{i%}:ы %{i%}:и %{i%}:у %{i%}:ү

!   %{z%}:з        %{y%}:ы
   %{n%}:н 
   %{z%}:0 ! %{y%}:0

   %{и%}:0 ! %{и%}:у %{и%}:ы 

	%{y%}:0

   %{к%}:к
   %{г%}:г
   %{н%}:0
	%{ң%}:ң
   %{л%}:л

   ! Abstract Archiphonemes: always disappear but condition phonology
   ! mostly for numerals and abbreviations

   %{р%}:р ! Until phonology is done

   %{а%}:0
   %{с%}:0
   %{з%}:0
   %{й%}:0
   !%{н%}:0

   %{э%}:0 
   %{ы%}:0

   %{❗%}:0
   %{☭%}:0

   % 
   %.
   %-
   %+
   %−
   №


   %>:0 ; 

Sets

Vow = Я Ю Ё А О Ы У Э Е И Ө Ү
      я ю ё а о ы у э е и ө ү ;

BackVow    =  Я Ю Ё А О Ы У
              я ю ё а о ы у ;

FrontVow   =  Э Е И Ө Ү 
              э е и ө ү ; 

RealVow = А О Ы У Э Е И Ө Ү
          а о ы у э е и ө ү ;

AbstractVow = %{э%} %{а%} ;

AbstractCns = %{с%} %{з%} %{й%} ;

Cns        =  Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
              б в г д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь ; 

RealCns        =  Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ 
                  б в г д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ; 


Liquid     = Л 
             л ; 

HighSonCns = Р Й Г
             р й г ;

Nasals      = Н М Ң
              н м ң ; 

Velars         = Ң Г К 
                ң г к ;

VoicelessCns = к п с т ц ш ф х 
               К П С Т Ц Ш Ф Х ; 

VoicelessCnsRus = З Б В Д Ж Г
                  з б в д ж г ;

HighVow = Ү И У Ы
          ү и у ы ;

RusHighVow = И У Ы
             и у ы ;


Rules


!!== Lenition ==!!

"{z} surfaces after a vowel"
%{z%}:з <=> :Vow/:0* _ ;
        except
            [ :Vow [ Velars: | %{ң%}: ] ]/:0* _ ;
            г:/:0* _ ;

!@ с о {ң}:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:о {n}:н >:0 {D}:д {A}:а

"Intervocalic coronal fricative voicing at a morpheme boundary"
Cx:Cy <=> [ :Vow (:р) ]/:0* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
          :Vow/:0* _ %{y%}:Vow/:0* ; ! also do before realised epenthetic vowel stem internally
          [ :Vow [ р: | й: ] %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}:0 ]* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ; ! also do after р or й
!!          р/:0 _ %>: :Vow ;
!      except
!          :р/:0* _ ;
!except??          :VoicelessCns/:0* _ ;
!          [ к: | р: ] _ %{и%}: ;

      where Cx in ( с ш )
            Cy in ( з ж )
      matched ;

!@ к а с:з >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ы

!@ к и р {y}:0 ш:ж >:0 {i}:и п 
!@ к и р {y}:0 ш:ж >:0 {I}:и р 
!@ ө с к е р т >:0 {I}:и п

!@ у ш:ж {y}:у л

!@ к о н к у р с:з >:0 {z}:0 {I}:у {n}:н >:0 {G}:г {A}:а

!@ ч у р т >:0 {z}:0 {I}:у {n}:0       


"Intervocalic т voicing at a morpheme boundary"
т:д <=> :Vow/:0* (:ъ) _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
        :Vow/:0* (:ъ) _ %{y%}:Vow/:0* ; ! also do before realised epenthetic vowel stem internally
        [ :Vow [ р: | л: ] %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}:0 ]* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ; ! also do after р, but NOT й
    except
        с:/:0 _ (ь:) %>: ;            ! always 0
        _ %{❗%}: ;

!@ б е т {❗}:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:и {n}:0

"Intervocalic voicing of к at morpheme boundary in monosyllabic stems"
к:г <=> [ .#. | %- ] [ ( :Cns* ) ( :Vow* ) :Vow ]/:0 _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
        :Vow _ %{☭%}: %>: :Vow/:0* ; 
        :Vow/:0* _ %{y%}:Vow/[ :0 - %>: ]* ; ! also do before realised epenthetic vowel stem internally

!@ с о о к:г >:0 {z}:0 {I}:у {n}:0

!@ р ы н о к:г {☭}:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:у {n}:0

!@ я з ы - с ө ө к:г >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ү {n}:0

!@ с ө ө к:г >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ү {n}:0

"Intervocalic voicing of п at a morpheme boundary"
п:в <=> :Vow/:0* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
        :Vow/:0* _ %{y%}:Vow/:0* ; ! also do before realised epenthetic vowel stem internally
        [ :Vow р: %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}:0 ]* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ; ! also do after р
      except
         :Vow _ %>: %{i%}: п: ;

!@ к:к ы:ы п:п {y}:0 с:с >:0 {i}:ы п:п

!"Intervocalic voiced velar deletion"
!Cx:0 <=> :Vow/:0* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
!     except
!         :Vow _ %{☭%}: :Vow/:0* ; 
!     where Cx in ( г ң ) ;
!

"Intervocalic voiced velar deletion"
г:0 <=> :Vow/:0* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
    except
        :Vow _ %{☭%}: %>: :Vow/:0* ; 

!@ э г:0 {I}:э р

"Exceptional deletion of ң"
%{ң%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;

"Intervocalic voiceless velar deletion"
к:0 <=> :Vow/:0* _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
     except
         [ .#. | %- ] [ ( :Cns* ) ( :Vow* ) :Vow ]/:0 _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
         :Vow _ %{☭%}: %>: :Vow/:0* ;
         !:Vow _ [ %{☭%}: :Vow ]/[ :0 -  %{☭%}: ]* ; 


!@ ө к:г >:0 {i}:ү м
!@ ө г:0 >:0 {i}:ө м
!@ б е л е:э к:0 >:0 {i}:э м
!@ б и л и:и к:0 >:0 {i}:и м

"Intervocalic {G} deletion"
%{g%}:0 <=> :Cns :Vow/:0* _ :Vow/:0* ;

!@ д у ж а а >:0 {g}:г {A}:а н


!!!== Desonorisation ==!!!

"{L} desonorisation"
%{L%}:д <=> :Liquid/[ ь | :0 ]* _ ;
        except
               %{с%}: (%-:) %>: _ ;

!@ м е д а л ь >:0 {L}:д {A}:а р

! {L} desonorisation should *not* happen here:
!@ д а г >:0 {L}:л {A}:а р

"N Desonorisation"
%{N%}:д <=> :Liquid/[ :ь | [ :0 - %{n%}: ] ]* _ ;
        except
               %{с%}: (%-:) %>: _ ;


"н desonorisation/devoicing after voiceless consonant and epenthesis"
н:т <=> [ :VoicelessCns %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}:0 ]* _ ;

!@ о д:т {у}:0 н:т >:0 {i}:у п

"л desonorisation/devoicing after voiceless consonant and epenthesis"
л:т <=> [ :VoicelessCns %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}:0 ]* _ ;



!!== Assimilation ==!!

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> ! :VoicelessCns/[ %>: | %  | %{☭%}:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ;   ! why define all the :0s manually?  why not just say :0* ?
          [ :VoicelessCns %>: ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{n%}: | AbstractCns: | %>: ] ] | %  ]* _ ;
                               :VoicelessCnsRus %{☭%}: %>: _ ;
                               %{с%}: (%-:) %>: _ ;
!          AbstrVoicelessCns:/[ %-: | %>: ] _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{M%}  %{D%}  %{L%}  %{N%}  %{G%} %{B%} %{Z%} %{J%} )
                Cy in (   п      т      т      т      к     п     с     ч   )
                matched;

!@ с а д {☭}:0 >:0 {D}:т {A}:а

!@ 5 {э}:0 {с}:0 - {G}:к {I}:и

!@ о к р у г {☭}:0 >:0 {G}:к {A}:а

"{J} devoices after liquids and nasals too"
%{J%}:ч <=> [ :Liquid | :Nasals ] ( ь ) %>: _ ;

"{B} nasal assimilation"
%{B%}:м <=> :Nasals %>: _ ;

"{B} after vowel "
%{B%}:в <=> :Vow %>: _ ;

"{g} voicing assimilation"
%{g%}:к <=> :VoicelessCns/:0* _ ;

"{L} nasal assimilation"
%{L%}:н <=> :Nasals/:0* %>: _ ;
        except
               %{с%}: (%-:) %>: _ ;

"л to н assimilation before Nasals when no epenthetic vowel"
л:н <=> _ %{y%}:0 :Nasals ;
    except
        [ :VoicelessCns %{y%}: ]/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* _ ;


!!!== Vowel harmony ==!!!

"Harmony of epenthesised vowel in some stems"
%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :Vx :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
         except
             [ [ :о | :у ] й: ]/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү и е э ө а о ы у я ё ю )
               Vy in ( ү и и и ү ы у ы у ы у у )
         matched ;

"Harmony of yotted %{y%}"
%{y%}:ю <=> [ [ :о | :у ] й: ]/:0* _ ;
        except
            _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/:0 ;

"{i} harmony"
%{i%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cns* :RealCns ]/:0* _ ;
         except
             [ :Vx Velars:0 ]/[ :0 - Velars: ]* _ ;
             [ :Vx %{л%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{л%}: ]* _ ;
         !    :Vow/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү и е э ө а о ы у я ё ю )
               Vy in ( ү и и и ү ы у ы у ы у у )
         matched ;

"Normal front vowel harmony for {E}"
%{E%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 | ь ]* _ ;
!        except
!            [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Normal front vowel harmony for {A}"
%{A%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 | ь ]* _ ;
            [ %{э%}: :Cns* ]/[ :%- | [ :0 - %{э%}: ] ]* _ ;
            [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь: :Cns* :RealCns ]/:0* _ ;
            [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
            [ :BackVow :Cns* ь: ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
!            Vow: [ %>: %{G%}:0 ]/:0* _ ; ! for dative case where {G} deletes
            [ FrontVow: й: ]/:0* _ ;  !@ ө й:0 >:0 {A}:е р
        except
            [ :FrontVow %{g%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{g%}: ]* _ ;
            _ [ %{g%}:0 %{A%}: ]/[ :0 - %{g%}: ]* ;
            [ BackVow: й: ]/:0* _ ;
!                                                   _ %>: %{g%}: ;

!@ Т ы в а   А С С Р {э}:0 >:0 {G}:г {A}:е
!@ р у б л ь >:0 {D}:д {A}:е н
!@ а н с а м б л ь >:0 {D}:д {A}:е н
!@ о б л а с т:0 ь:0 {☭}:0 >:0 {D}:т {A}:а н

"yotted {A} harmony"
%{A%}:я <=> [ BackVow: й: ]/:0* _ ;
         except
             ! Vow: [ %>: %{G%}:0 ]/:0* _ ; 
             [ %{э%}: :Cns* ]/[ :%- | [ :0 - %{э%}: ] ]* _ ;
             ! [ :FrontVow %{g%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{g%}: ]* _ ;
             _ [ %{g%}:0 %{A%}: ]/[ :0 - %{g%}: ]* ;

"yotted {E} harmony"
%{E%}:я <=> [ :BackVow й: ]/:0* _ ; 


"{I} harmony"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 | %- ]* _ ;
             .#. (RealCns:) :Vx RealCns: %>: _ ; ! Monosyllabic stems with cns deletion
         !!    :Vx/:0* _ ;
         except
             [ :Vx Velars:0 ]/[ :0 - Velars: ]* _ ;
         !    :Vow/:0* _ ;
             [ %{n%}: %{N%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{n%}: | %{N%}: ] ]* _ .#. ;

         !!    [ :Vow :Vow ]/:0* _ ;
             [ :Vx %{р%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{р%}: ]* _ ;
             [ :Vx й:0 ]/[ :0 - й: ]* _ ;
             [ AbstractVow:0 :Cns* ]/[ :%- | :0 - AbstractVow: ]* _ ;
             [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь: :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;  ! always и
             [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;      ! always и
             ! [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ь: ]/[ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;
!             л ь: %>: [ :Cns | :0 ]* _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү и е э ө а о ы у я ё ю )
               Vy in ( ү и и и ү ы у ы у ы у у )
         matched ;

!@ о б л а с т:0 ь:0 {☭}:0 >:0 {N}:т {I}:ы ң

!@ К Т Р К {а}:0 - >:0 {N}:н {I}:ы ң

"{I} always front when intervening Cль"
!%{I%}:и <=> л ь: %>: [ :Cns | :0 ]*  _ ;
%{I%}:и <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь: :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
            [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
            ! [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ь: ]/[ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;
        except
            [ %{n%}: %{N%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{n%}: | %{N%}: ] ]* _ .#. ;
            ! [ :BackVow с т:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - т: ]* _ ;

!@ а н с а м б л ь:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:и {n}:н >:0 {G}:г {A}:е

"{I} harmony immediately after short vowels"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx/:0* _ ;
         except
             .#. (RealCns:) :Vx RealCns: %>: _ ; ! Monosyllabic stems with cns deletion
             [ :Vow :RealVow ]/:0* _ ;
             [ :Vx Velars:0 ]/[ :0 - Velars: ]* _ ;
             [ :Vx %{л%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{л%}: ]* _ ;
             [ :Vx %{р%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{р%}: ]* _ ;
             [ :Vx п:0 ]/[ :0 - п: ]* _ ;
             [ :Vx с:0 ]/[ :0 - с: ]* _ ;
             [ AbstractVow:0 :Cns* ]/[ :%- | :0 - AbstractVow: ]* _ ;
             [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;   ! always и
             %{B%}: %{A%}: %>: _ ;
             ! [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ь: ]/[ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү и е э ө а о ы у я ё ю ) ! FIXME: CHECK о ө ё
               Vy in ( ү и э э ө а о ы у а о у )
         matched ;

!@ С и б и р ь {☭}:0 >:0 {N}:н {I}:и ң

"Abstract harmony for {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ AbstractVow:0 :Cns* ]/[ :%- | [ :0 - [ %{N%}: | %{n%}: | AbstractVow: ] ]* ]* _ ;
         except
             ! л ь: %>: [ :Cns | :0 ]* _ ;
             [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь: :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
             [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
             ! [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ь: ]/[ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;
         where AbstractVow in ( %{э%} )
                        Vy in (   и   )
         matched ;
